Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3411
Director; annual report; contents; public record.

The director shall make an annual report, at least thirty days prior to January 1 of each year, showing all income and expenses and any other facts relevant to sections 2-3401 to 2-3416. The report shall be available to the public.

Laws 1976, LB 514, § 11.
December 31, 2027